Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.810

Termination of municipal court—Notice.

(1) Any city having entered into an agreement for court services with the county must provide written notice of the intent to terminate the agreement to the county legislative authority and to the administrative office of the courts not less than one year prior to February 1st of the year in which all district court judges are subject to election.

(2) Any city that terminates an agreement for court services to be provided by a district court may terminate the agreement only at the end of a four-year district court judicial term.

(3) A county that wishes to terminate an agreement with a city for the provision of court services must provide written notice of the intent to terminate the agreement to the city legislative authority and to the administrative office of the courts not less than one year prior to the expiration of the agreement.

[ 2024 c 61 s 4; 2001 c 68 s 1; 1993 c 317 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1993 c 317: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 c 317 s 11.]

Effective date—1993 c 317: "This act shall take effect January 1, 1995." [ 1993 c 317 s 12.]